New York, session 2025-2026, A6162.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 236 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 236. Notification of emergency situations. The division of state 4 police shall notify every child day care provider, child day care 5 center, group family day care home, family day care home, and school 6 aged child care home of any emergency situation occurring in the vicini- 7 ty of such child day care center or group day care home, including but 8 not limited to any school evacuations or lockdowns, and any active 9 shooter incidents occurring in the vicinity of such child day care 10 center or group day care home. Such notice shall be given by a telephone 11 call made to a designated individual at each child day care provider, 12 child day care center, group family day care home, family day care home, 13 and school aged child care home within thirty minutes of the occurrence 14 of the emergency situation. Each child day care provider, child day care 15 center, group family day care home, family day care home, and school 16 aged child care home shall provide the local department of the division 17 of state police with the name and contact information for the person it 18 has selected as the designated person to receive notice of such emergen- 19 cies. 20 § 2. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new section 21 209-uu to read as follows: 22 § 209-uu. Notification of emergency situations. Each police department 23 organized at the county, city or town level shall notify every child day EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10191-01-5 A. 6162 2 1 care provider, child day care center, group family day care home, family 2 day care home, and school aged child care home of any emergency situ- 3 ation occurring in the vicinity of such child day care center or group 4 day care home, including but not limited to any school evacuations or 5 lockdowns, and any active shooter incidents occurring in the vicinity of 6 such child day care provider, child day care center, group family day 7 care home, family day care home, and school aged child care home. Such 8 notice shall be given by a telephone call made to a designated individ- 9 ual at each child day care provider, child day care center, group family 10 day care home, family day care home, and school aged child care home 11 within thirty minutes of the occurrence of the emergency situation. Each 12 child day care provider, child day care center, group family day care 13 home, family day care home, and school aged child care home shall 14 provide the local county, city and town police departments with the name 15 and contact information for the person it has selected as the designated 16 person to receive notice of such emergencies. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law.